Wyoming, session 2025, HB0268.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-103(a) by creating a new
paragraph (li) is amended to read:

15-1-103. General powers of governing bodies.

(a) The governing bodies of all cities and towns may:

HB0268

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0510
(li) Establish and maintain paid parking meters
or zones requiring the deposit therein of renumeration
either in cash or through a digital payment system for the
privilege of parking cars or other vehicles upon any
streets or highways in the city or town only upon a
majority vote of qualified electors at an election held in
the same manner as provided by law for the submission of a
bond issue under W.S. 22-21-101 through 22-21-112. Any
ballot proposition pursuant to this paragraph shall include
a description of the proposed location of the paid parking
meters or zones.

Section 2. This act shall apply to all existing,
planned and future paid parking meters or zones on and
after the effective date of this act.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0268